Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.07.040

Certification of ordinance—Transcript of record to secretary of state.

When an ordinance is passed as provided in RCW 35A.07.020 or 35A.07.030, the clerk of the charter city shall forward to the secretary of state a certified copy thereof. Upon the filing of the certified copy of the ordinance in the office of the secretary of state, such city shall be classified as a charter code city and shall thereafter be governed under the provisions of this optional municipal code and have the powers conferred hereby.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.07.040.]